California statutes. Civil Code
under Civil Code Section 1946.7Part I.Statement By Tenant I, [insert name of tenant], state as follows: I, or a member of my household or immediate family, have been a victim of:[insert one or more of the following: domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, human trafficking, elder abuse, dependent adult abuse, or a crime that caused bodily injury or death, a crime that included the exhibition, drawing, brandishing, or use of a firearm or other deadly weapon or instrument, or a crime that included the use of force against the victim or a threat of force against the victim.] The most recent incident(s) happened on or about:[insert date or dates.] The
 incident(s) was/were committed by the following person(s), with these physical description(s), if known and safe to provide:[if known and safe to provide, insert name(s) and physical description(s).](signature of tenant)(date) Part II.Qualified Third Party StatementI, [insert name of qualified third party], state as follows: My business address and phone number are:[insert business address and phone number.]Check and complete one of the following:____I meet the requirements for a sexual assault counselor provided in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code and I am either engaged in an office, hospital, institution, or center commonly known as a rape crisis center described in that section or employed by an organization providing the programs specified in Section 13835.2 of the Penal Code.____I meet the requirements for a domestic violence counselor provided in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code and I am employed, whether financially compensated or not, by a domestic violence victim service organization, as defined in that section.____I meet the requirements for a human trafficking caseworker provided in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code and I am employed, whether financially compensated or not, by an organization that provides programs specified in Section 18294 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or in Section 13835.2 of the Penal Code.____I meet the definition of “victim of violent crime advocate” provided in Section 1947.6 of the Civil Code and I am employed, whether financially compensated or not, by an agency or organization that has a documented record of providing services to victims of violent crime or provides those
 services under the auspices or supervision of a court or a law enforcement or prosecution agency.____I am licensed by the State of California as a:[insert one of the following: physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, registered nurse, psychiatrist, psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, or licensed professional clinical counselor.] and I am licensed by, and my license number is:[insert name of state licensing entity and license number.]The person who signed the Statement By Tenant above stated to me that the person, or a member of the person’s household or immediate family, is a victim of:[insert one or more of the following: domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, human trafficking, elder abuse, dependent adult abuse, or a crime that caused physical injury, emotional injury and the threat of physical injury, or death.]The person further stated to me the incident(s) occurred on or about the date(s) stated above.I understand that the person who made the Statement By Tenant may use this document as a basis for terminating a lease with the person’s landlord.(signature of qualified third
 party)(date)(C) The documentation may be signed by a person who meets the requirements for a sexual assault counselor, domestic violence counselor, a human trafficking caseworker, or a victim of violent crime advocate only if the documentation displays the letterhead of the office, hospital, institution, center, or organization, as appropriate, that engages or employs, whether financially compensated or not, this counselor, caseworker, or advocate.

(4) Any other form of documentation that reasonably verifies that the crime or act listed in subdivision (a) occurred.

(c) If the tenant is terminating tenancy pursuant to subdivision (a) because an immediate family
 member is a victim of an eligible act or crime listed in subdivision (a) and that tenant did not live in the same household as the immediate family member at the time of the act or crime, and no part of the act or crime occurred within the dwelling unit or within 1,000 feet of the dwelling unit of the tenant, the tenant shall attach to the notice and other documentation required by subdivision (b) a written statement stating all of the following:

(1) The tenant’s immediate family member was a victim of an act or crime listed in subdivision (a).

(2) The tenant intends to relocate as a result of the tenant’s immediate family member being a victim of an act or crime listed in subdivision (a).

(3) The tenant is relocating to increase the safety, physical well-being, emotional well-being, psychological well-being, or
 financial security of the tenant or of the tenant’s immediate family member as a result of the act or crime.

(d) The notice to terminate the tenancy shall be given within 180 days of the date that any order described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) was issued, within 180 days of the date that any written report described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) was made, within 180 days of the date that an act or a crime described in subdivision (a) occurred, or within the time period described in Section 1946.

(e) If notice to terminate the tenancy is provided to the landlord under this section, the tenant shall be responsible for payment of rent for no more than 14 calendar days following the giving of the notice, or for any shorter appropriate period as described in Section 1946 or the lease or rental agreement. The tenant shall be released without penalty from any further rent
 or other payment obligation to the landlord under the lease or rental agreement. If the premises are relet to another party prior to the end of the obligation to pay rent, the rent owed under this subdivision shall be prorated.

(f) Notwithstanding any law, a landlord shall not, due to the termination, require a tenant who terminates a lease or rental agreement pursuant to this section to forfeit any security deposit money or advance rent paid. A tenant who terminates a rental agreement pursuant to this section shall not be considered for any purpose, by reason of the termination, to have breached the lease or rental agreement. In all other respects, the law governing the security deposit shall apply.

(g) This section does not relieve a tenant, other than the tenant who is, or who has a household member or immediate family member who is, a victim of an act or crime listed in
 subdivision (a) and members of that tenant’s household, from their obligations under the lease or rental agreement.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Household member” means a member of the tenant’s family who lives in the same residential unit as the tenant.

(2) “Health practitioner” means a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist, registered nurse, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed professional clinical counselor, or a victim of violent crime advocate.

(3) “Immediate family member” means the parent, stepparent, spouse, child, child-in-law, stepchild, or sibling of the tenant, or any person living in the tenant’s household
 at the time the crime or act listed in subdivision (a) occurred who has a relationship with the tenant that is substantially similar to that of a family member.

(4) “Qualified third party” means a health practitioner, domestic violence counselor, as defined in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code, a sexual assault counselor, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code, or a human trafficking caseworker, as defined in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code.

(5) “Victim of violent crime advocate” means a person who is employed, whether financially compensated or not, for the purpose of rendering advice or assistance to victims of violent crimes for an agency or organization that has a documented record of providing services to victims of violent crime or provides those services under the auspices or supervision of a court or a law enforcement or prosecution agency.

(i) (1) A landlord shall not disclose any information provided by a tenant under this section to a third party unless the disclosure satisfies one or more of the following:

(A) The tenant consents in writing to the disclosure.

(B) The disclosure is required by law or order of the court.

(2) A landlord’s communication to a qualified third party who provides documentation under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) to verify the contents of that documentation is not disclosure for purposes of this subdivision.

(j) An owner or an owner’s agent shall not refuse to rent a dwelling unit to an otherwise qualified prospective tenant or refuse to continue to rent to an existing tenant
 solely on the basis that the tenant has previously exercised the tenant’s rights under this section or has previously terminated a tenancy because of the circumstances described in subdivision (a).

(k) A landlord or agent of a landlord who violates this section shall be liable to the tenant in a civil action for both of the following:

(1) The actual damages sustained by the tenant.

(2) (A) Statutory damages of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a landlord or agent of a landlord who violates this section shall not be liable for statutory damages if the tenant provided documentation of the crime or act to the landlord or the agent of the
 landlord pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) only.

(l) The remedies provided by this section shall be in addition to any other remedy provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.   (SB 1017)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1946.8.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Individual in an emergency” means a person who believes that immediate action is required to prevent or mitigate the loss or impairment of life, health, or property.

(2) “Occupant” means a person residing in a dwelling unit with the tenant. “Occupant” includes lodgers as defined in Section 1946.5.

(3) “Penalties” means the following:

(A) The actual or threatened assessment of fees, fines, or penalties.

(B) The actual or threatened termination of a tenancy or the actual or
 threatened failure to renew a tenancy.

(C) Subjecting a tenant to inferior terms, privileges, and conditions of tenancy in comparison to tenants who have not sought law enforcement assistance or emergency assistance.

(4) “Resident” means a member of the tenant’s household or any other occupant living in the dwelling unit with the consent of the tenant.

(5) “Victim of abuse” includes:

(A) A victim of domestic violence as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(B) A victim of elder or dependent adult abuse as defined in Section 15610.07 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) A victim of human trafficking as described in
 Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.

(D) A victim of sexual assault, meaning a victim of any act made punishable by Section 261, 264.1, 285, 286, 288, 288a, or 289 of the Penal Code.

(E) A victim of stalking as described in Section 1708.7 of this code or Section 646.9 of the Penal Code.

(6) “Victim of crime” means any victim of a misdemeanor or felony.

(b) Any provision in a rental or lease agreement for a dwelling unit that prohibits or limits, or threatens to prohibit or limit, a tenant’s, resident’s, or other person’s right to summon law enforcement assistance or emergency assistance as, or on behalf of, a victim of abuse, a victim of crime, or an individual in an emergency, if the tenant, resident, or other person believes that the law enforcement
 assistance or emergency assistance is necessary to prevent or address the perpetration, escalation, or exacerbation of the abuse, crime, or emergency, shall be void as contrary to public policy.

(c) A landlord shall not impose, or threaten to impose, penalties on a tenant or resident who exercises the tenant’s or resident’s right to summon law enforcement assistance or emergency assistance as, or on behalf of, a victim of abuse, a victim of crime, or an individual in an emergency, based on the person’s belief that the assistance is necessary, as described in subdivision (b). A landlord shall not impose, or threaten to impose, penalties on a tenant or resident as a consequence of a person who is not a resident or tenant summoning law enforcement assistance or emergency assistance on the tenant’s, resident’s, or other person’s behalf, based on the person’s belief that the assistance is necessary.

(d) Documentation is not required to establish belief for purposes of subdivision (b) or (c), but belief may be established by documents such as those described in Section 1161.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(f) (1) In an action for unlawful detainer, a tenant, resident, or occupant may raise, as an affirmative defense, that the landlord or owner violated this section.

(2) There is a rebuttable presumption that a tenant, resident, or occupant has established an affirmative defense under this subdivision if the landlord or owner files a complaint for unlawful detainer within 30 days of a resident, tenant, or other person
 summoning law enforcement assistance or emergency assistance and the complaint is based upon a notice that alleges that the act of summoning law enforcement assistance or emergency assistance as, or on behalf of, a victim of abuse, a victim of crime, or an individual in an emergency constitutes a rental agreement violation, lease violation, or a nuisance. A reference to a person summoning law enforcement in a notice that is the basis for a complaint for unlawful detainer that is necessary to describe conduct that is alleged to constitute a violation of a rental agreement or lease is not, in itself, an allegation for purposes of this paragraph.

(3) A landlord or owner may rebut the presumption described in paragraph (2) by demonstrating that a reason other than the summoning of law enforcement or emergency assistance as, or on behalf of, a victim of abuse, a victim of crime, or an individual in an emergency was a substantial motivating factor
 for filing the complaint.

(g) In addition to other remedies provided by law, a violation of this section entitles a tenant, a resident, or other aggrieved person to seek injunctive relief prohibiting the landlord from creating or enforcing policies in violation of this section, or from imposing or threatening to impose penalties against the tenant, resident, or other aggrieved person based on summoning law enforcement or emergency assistance as, or on behalf of, a victim of abuse, a victim of crime, or an individual in an emergency.

(h) This section does not permit an injunction to be entered that would prohibit the filing of an unlawful detainer action.

(i) This section does not limit a landlord’s exercise of the landlord’s other rights under a lease or rental agreement, or under other law pertaining to the hiring
 of property, with regard to matters that are not addressed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 6.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1946.9.

(a) For the purposes of tenant screening, a landlord or a landlord’s agent shall not make an adverse action based on any of the following:

(1) An allegation that the prospective tenant breached a lease or rental agreement if the alleged breach stemmed from an act of abuse or violence against a tenant, a tenant’s immediate family member, or a tenant’s household member, and the prospective tenant is not alleged to have committed the abuse or violence. The landlord shall accept any form of documentation evidencing abuse or violence against the tenant, the tenant’s immediate family member, or the tenant’s household member, as provided by subdivision (d) of Section 1941.5, as sufficient for the purposes of this paragraph.

(2) The prospective tenant having previously requested to have their locks changed pursuant to Section 1941.5 or 1941.6, regardless of whether the request was granted.

(3) The prospective tenant, or an immediate family member or household member of the prospective tenant, having been a victim of abuse or violence. A landlord or the landlord’s agent may request that a prospective tenant provide documentation described in subdivision (d) of Section 1941.5 to establish if a prospective tenant, or an immediate family member or household member of the prospective member, has been a victim of abuse or violence for the purposes of this paragraph. If the prospective tenant provides documentation described in subdivision (d) of Section 1941.5, the landlord shall accept the documentation as sufficient to establish that a prospective tenant, or an immediate family member or household member of
 the prospective member, has been a victim of abuse or violence for the purposes of this paragraph.

(4) The prospective tenant, or a guest of the prospective tenant, having previously summoned law enforcement assistance or emergency assistance, as, or on behalf of a victim of abuse, a victim of crime, or an individual in an emergency, as provided in Section 1946.8.

(b) A landlord or agent of a landlord who violates this section shall be liable to the prospective or current tenant in a civil action for both of the following:

(1) The actual damages sustained by the prospective or current tenant.

(2) Statutory damages of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) The remedies provided by this section shall be in addition to any other remedy provided by law.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Abuse or violence” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1161.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) “Adverse action” means either of the following:

(A) Denial of a prospective tenant’s rental application.

(B) Approval of a prospective tenant’s rental application, subject to terms or conditions different and less favorable to the prospective tenant than those included in any written notice, statement, or advertisement
 for the rental unit, including written communication sent directly from the landlord or landlord’s agent to a prospective tenant.

(3) “Household member” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 1946.7.

(4) “Immediate family member” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 1946.7.

(5) “Tenant” means tenant, subtenant, lessee, or sublessee.

(6) “Tenant screening” means any process used by a landlord or landlord’s agent to evaluate the fitness of a prospective tenant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 75, Sec. 4.   (SB 1051)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1947.

When there is no usage or contract to the contrary, rents are payable at the termination of the holding, when it does not exceed one year. If the holding is by the day, week, month, quarter, or year, rent is payable at the termination of the respective periods, as it successively becomes due.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1947.1.

(a) If an owner of a qualifying residential property provides parking with the qualifying residential property, they shall unbundle parking from the price of rent.

(b) (1) Off-street parking accessory to a qualifying residential property shall not be included in any residential rental agreement and shall be subject to a rental agreement addendum or provided in a separate rental agreement.

(2) All off-street parking spaces shall be unbundled from the qualifying residential property for the life of the property.

(c) (1) A tenant
 of a qualifying residential property shall have the right of first refusal to parking spaces built for their property. Remaining residential unbundled parking spaces that are not leased to tenants of the residential dwelling may be leased by the owner of the qualifying residential property to other on-site users or to off-site residential users on a month-to-month basis.

(2) If there are unavailable parking spaces on the residential property upon the occupancy of a new tenant, and parking spaces are subsequently built for the residential dwelling or otherwise becomes available on the qualifying residential property, the new tenant shall receive a right of first refusal to an available parking space.

(d) (1) A tenant’s failure to pay the parking fee pursuant to a separately
 leased parking agreement shall not form the basis of any unlawful detainer action against the tenant.

(2) If a tenant fails to pay by the 45th day following the date payment is owed for a separately leased parking space, the property owner may revoke that tenant’s right to lease that parking spot.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Owner of qualifying residential property” includes any person, acting as principal or through an agent, having the right to offer qualifying residential property for rent, and includes a predecessor in interest to the owner.

(2) (A) “Qualifying residential property” means any dwelling or unit that is intended for
 human habitation that meets all of the following criteria:

(i) The property is issued a certificate of occupancy on or after January 1, 2025.

(ii) The property consists of 16 or more residential units.

(iii) The property is located in one of the following counties:

(I) Alameda.

(II) Fresno.

(III) Los Angeles.

(IV) Riverside.

(V) Sacramento.

(VI) San Bernardino.

(VII) San Joaquin.

(VIII) Santa Clara.

(IX) Shasta.

(X) Ventura.

(B) “Qualifying residential property” does not include any of the following:

(i) A residential property or unit with an individual garage that is functionally a part of the property or unit, including, but not limited to, townhouses and row houses.

(ii) A housing development of which 100 percent of its units, exclusive of any manager’s unit or units, are restricted by deed, regulatory
 restriction contained in an agreement with a governmental agency, or other recorded document as affordable housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) A housing development that receives low-income housing tax credits pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 42).

(iv) A housing development that is financed with tax-exempt bonds pursuant to a program administered by the California Housing Finance Agency.

(v) A residential unit that is leased to a tenant who receives a federal housing assistance voucher issued under Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 1437f), including a federal Department of Housing and Urban Development Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing voucher.

(3) “Unbundled parking” means the practice of selling or leasing parking spaces separate from the lease of the residential property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 420, Sec. 1.   (AB 2898)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1947.3.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a landlord or a landlord’s agent shall allow a tenant to pay rent and deposit of security by at least one form of payment that is neither cash nor electronic funds transfer.

(2) A landlord or a landlord’s agent may demand or require cash as the exclusive form of payment of rent or deposit of security if the tenant has previously attempted to pay the landlord or landlord’s agent with a check drawn on insufficient funds or the tenant has instructed the drawee to stop payment on a check, draft, or order for the payment of money. The landlord may demand or require cash as the exclusive form of payment only for a period not
 exceeding three months following an attempt to pay with a check on insufficient funds or following a tenant’s instruction to stop payment. If the landlord chooses to demand or require cash payment under these circumstances, the landlord shall give the tenant a written notice stating that the payment instrument was dishonored and informing the tenant that the tenant shall pay in cash for a period determined by the landlord, not to exceed three months, and attach a copy of the dishonored instrument to the notice. The notice shall comply with Section 827 if demanding or requiring payment in cash constitutes a change in the terms of the lease.

(3) Subject to the limitations below, a landlord or a landlord’s agent shall allow a tenant to pay rent through a third party.

(A) A landlord
 or landlord’s agent is not required to accept the rent payment tendered by a third party unless the third party has provided to the landlord or landlord’s agent a signed
 acknowledgment stating that they are not currently a tenant of the premises for which the rent payment is being made and that acceptance of the rent payment does not create a new tenancy with the third party.

(B) Failure by a third party to provide the signed acknowledgment to the landlord or landlord’s agent shall void the obligation of a landlord or landlord’s agent to accept a tenant’s rent tendered by a third party.

(C) The landlord or landlord’s agent may, but is not required to, provide a form acknowledgment to be used by third parties, as provided for in subparagraph (A), provided however that a landlord shall accept as sufficient for compliance with subparagraph (A) an acknowledgment in substantially the following form:
I, [insert name of third party], state as follows:

I am not currently a tenant of the premises located at [insert address of premises].

I acknowledge that acceptance of the rent payment I am offering for the premises does not create a new tenancy.(signature of third party)(date)
(D) A
 landlord or landlord’s agent may require a signed acknowledgment for each rent payment made by the third party. A landlord or landlord’s agent and the third party may agree that one acknowledgment shall be sufficient for when the third party makes more than one rent payment during a period of time.

(E) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to require a landlord or landlord’s agent to enter into a contract in connection with a federal, state, or local housing assistance program, including, but not limited to, the federal housing assistance voucher programs under Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f).

(4) Paragraphs (2) and (3) do not enlarge or diminish a landlord’s or landlord’s agent’s legal right to terminate a tenancy. Nothing in
 paragraph (3) is intended to extend the due date for any rent payment or require a landlord or landlord’s agent to accept tender of rent beyond the expiration of the period stated in paragraph (2) of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) A landlord or its agent shall not charge a tenant any fee for payment by check for rent or security deposit as described in this section. 

(c) For the purposes of this section, the issuance of a money order or a cashier’s check is direct evidence only that the instrument was issued.

(d) For purposes of this section, “electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an
 electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, computer, or magnetic tape so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. “Electronic funds transfer” includes, but is not limited to, point-of-sale transfers, direct deposits or withdrawals of funds, transfers initiated by telephone, transfers via an automated clearinghouse, transfers initiated electronically that deliver a paper instrument, and transfers authorized in advance to recur at substantially regular intervals.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the tenant and landlord or agent to mutually agree that rent payments may be made in cash or by electronic funds transfer, so long as another form of payment is also authorized, subject to the requirements of subdivision (a).

(f) A waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   (SB 611)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1947.5.

(a) A landlord of a residential dwelling unit, as defined in Section 1940, or his or her agent, may prohibit the smoking of a cigarette, as defined in Section 104556 of the Health and Safety Code, or other tobacco product on the property or in any building or portion of the building, including any dwelling unit, other interior or exterior area, or the premises on which it is located, in accordance with this article.

(b) (1) Every lease or rental agreement entered into on or after January 1, 2012, for a residential dwelling unit on property on any portion of which the landlord has prohibited the smoking of cigarettes or other tobacco products pursuant to this article shall include a provision that specifies the areas on the property where smoking is prohibited, if the lessee has not previously occupied the dwelling unit.

(2) For a lease or rental agreement entered into before January 1, 2012, a prohibition against the smoking of cigarettes or other tobacco products in any portion of the property in which smoking was previously permitted shall constitute a change of the terms of tenancy, requiring adequate notice in writing, to be provided in the manner prescribed in Section 827.

(c) A landlord who exercises the
authority provided in subdivision (a) to prohibit smoking shall be subject to federal, state, and local requirements governing changes to the terms of a lease or rental agreement for tenants with leases or rental agreements that are in existence at the time that the policy limiting or prohibiting smoking is adopted.

(d) This section shall not be construed to preempt any local ordinance in effect on or before January 1, 2012, or any provision of a local ordinance in effect on or after January 1, 2012, that restricts the smoking of cigarettes or other tobacco products.

(e) A limitation or prohibition of the use of any tobacco product shall not affect any other term or condition of the tenancy, nor shall this section be construed to require statutory authority to establish or enforce any other lawful term or condition of the tenancy.

(f) For purposes of this section, “smoking” has the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(g) For purposes of this section, “tobacco product” means a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 8.   (SB 5 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1947.6.

(a) For any lease executed, extended, or renewed on and after July 1, 2015, a lessor of a dwelling shall approve a written request of a lessee to install an electric vehicle charging station at a parking space allotted for the lessee that meets the requirements of this section and complies with the lessor’s procedural approval process for modification to the property.

(b) This section does not apply to residential rental properties where:

(1) Electric vehicle charging stations already exist for lessees in a ratio that is equal to or greater than 10 percent of the designated parking spaces.

(2) Parking is not provided as part of the lease agreement.

(3) There are fewer than five parking spaces.

(4) The dwelling is subject to a residential rent control ordinance. This paragraph shall not apply to a lease executed, extended, or renewed on and after January 1, 2019.

(5) The dwelling is subject to both a residential rent control ordinance and an ordinance, adopted on or before January 1, 2018, that requires the lessor to approve a lessee’s written request to install an electric vehicle charging station at a parking space allotted to the lessee.

(c) For purposes of this section, “electric vehicle
 charging station” or “charging station” means any level of electric vehicle supply equipment station that is designed and built in compliance with Article 625 of the California Electrical Code, as it reads on the effective date of this section, and delivers electricity from a source outside an electric vehicle into a plug-in electric vehicle.

(d) A lessor shall not be obligated to provide an additional parking space to a lessee in order to accommodate an electric vehicle charging station.

(e) If the electric vehicle charging station has the effect of providing the lessee with a reserved parking space, the lessor may charge a monthly rental amount for that parking space.

(f) An electric vehicle charging station and all
 modifications and improvements to the property shall comply with federal, state, and local law, and all applicable zoning requirements, land use requirements, and covenants, conditions, and restrictions.

(g) A lessee’s written request to make a modification to the property in order to install and use an electric vehicle charging station shall include, but is not limited to, the lessee’s consent to enter into a written agreement that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Compliance with the lessor’s requirements for the installation, use, maintenance, and removal of the charging station and installation, use, and maintenance of the infrastructure for the charging station.

(2) Compliance with the lessor’s
 requirements for the lessee to provide a complete financial analysis and scope of work regarding the installation of the charging station and its infrastructure.

(3) A written description of how, when, and where the modifications and improvements to the property are proposed to be made consistent with those items specified in the “Permitting Checklist” of the “Zero-Emission Vehicles in California: Community Readiness Guidebook” published by the Office of Planning and Research.

(4) Obligation of the lessee to pay the lessor all costs associated with the lessor’s installation of the charging station and its infrastructure prior to any modification or improvement being made to the leased property. The costs associated with modifications and improvements shall include, but are not
 limited to, the cost of permits, supervision, construction, and, solely if required by the contractor, consistent with its past performance of work for the lessor, performance bonds.

(5) Obligation of the lessee to pay as part of rent for the costs associated with the electrical usage of the charging station, and cost for damage, maintenance, repair, removal, and replacement of the charging station, and modifications or improvements made to the property associated with the charging station.

(h) The lessee and each successor lessee shall obtain personal liability coverage, as described in Section 108 of the Insurance Code,
 in an amount not to exceed 10 times the annual rent changed for the dwelling, covering property damage and personal injury proximately caused by the installation or operation of the electric vehicle charging station. The policy shall be maintained in full force and effect from the time of installation of the electric vehicle charging station until the electric vehicle charging station is removed or the lessee forfeits possession of the dwelling to the lessor.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (h), no insurance shall be required of a lessee installing an electric vehicle charging station if both of the following are satisfied:

(1) The electric vehicle charging station has been certified by a Nationally Recognized Testing Laboratory that is approved
 by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration of the United States Department of Labor.

(2) The electric vehicle charging station and any associated alterations to the dwelling’s electrical system are performed by a licensed electrician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 855, Sec. 1.   (SB 638)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1947.7.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the operation of local rent stabilization programs can be complex and that disputes often arise with regard to standards of compliance with the regulatory processes of those programs. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to limit the imposition of penalties and sanctions against an owner of residential rental units where that person has attempted in good faith to fully comply with the regulatory processes.

(b) An owner
of a residential rental unit who is in substantial compliance with an ordinance or charter that controls or establishes a system of controls on the price at which residential rental units may be offered for rent or lease and which requires the registration of rents, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, shall not be assessed a penalty or any other sanction for noncompliance with the ordinance, charter, or regulation.

Restitution to the tenant or recovery of the registration or filing fees due to the local agency shall be the exclusive remedies which may be imposed against an owner of a residential rental unit who is in substantial compliance with the ordinance, charter, or regulation.

“Substantial compliance,” as used in this subdivision, means that the owner of a residential rental unit has made a good faith attempt to comply with the ordinance, charter, or regulation sufficient to reasonably carry out the intent and
purpose of the ordinance, charter, or regulation, but is not in full compliance, and has, after receiving notice of a deficiency from the local agency, cured the defect in a timely manner, as reasonably determined by the local agency.

“Local agency,” as used in this subdivision, means the public entity responsible for the implementation of the ordinance, charter, or regulation.

(c) For any residential unit which has been registered and for which a base rent has been listed or for any residential unit which an owner can show, by a preponderance of the evidence, a good faith attempt to comply with the registration requirements or who was exempt from registration requirements in a previous version of the ordinance or charter and for which the owner of that residential unit has subsequently found not to have been in compliance with the ordinance, charter, or regulation, all annual rent adjustments which
may have been denied during the period of the owner’s noncompliance shall be restored prospectively once the owner is in compliance with the ordinance, charter, or regulation.

(d) In those jurisdictions where, prior to January 1, 1990, the local ordinance did not allow the restoration of annual rent adjustment, once the owner is in compliance with this section the local agency may phase in any increase in rent caused by the restoration of the annual rent adjustments that is in excess of 20 percent over the rent previously paid by the tenant, in equal installments over three years, if the tenant demonstrates undue financial hardship due to the restoration of the full annual rent adjustments. This subdivision shall remain operative only until January 1, 1993, unless a later enacted statute which is chaptered by January 1, 1993, deletes or extends that date.
